lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai ir stelažai > Štangų stovai: Pusės jėgos stovai; Jėgos stovo priedai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동 기구/거치대 > 파워 랙: 하프 파워 랙; 파워 랙 어태치먼트
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 推举机 > 力量架: 半深蹲架; 力量训练架配件
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Μηχανήματα & δοκοί άρσης βαρών > Δοκοί ισχύος: Μισά power rack; Προσαρτήματα power rack
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Aparelhos e suportes para levantamento de peso > Power Racks: Meias gaiolas de musculação; Acessórios para gaiolas de musculação
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Racks e máquinas de halterofilismo > Racks para musculação: Gaiolas de agachamento abertas; Acessórios para gaiolas de agachamento
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas > Bastidores eléctricos: Semijaulas de potencia; Accesorios para jaulas de potencia
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Machines d’haltérophilie et supports pour barres > Racks à squat: Demi-racks de musculation; Extensions pour racks de musculation
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Krafttrainingsgeräte > Power-Racks: Half Racks; Power-Rack-Aufsätze
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Машини за вдигане на тежести и стойки > Силови квадрати: Компактни силови клетки; Приставки за силови квадрати
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostolaitteet ja -telineet > Kyykkytelineet: Puolikyykkyhäkit; Kyykkyhäkkien lisäosat
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Krachtapparatuur en -rekken > Powerrekken: Half power racks; Power rack-opzetstukken
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティングマシン > パワーラック: ハーフパワーラック; パワーラック用アタッチメント
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Macchine e rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi > Rack di potenza: Half rack; Accessori per power rack
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Sprave i stalci za dizanje utega > Stalak za vježbe s utezima: Polu-stalci za vježbe s utezima; Nastavci za stalak za vježbe s utezima
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri > Elektrikli Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri: Yarım power rack'ler; Power rack aparatları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Giàn tập tạ > Ghế tập tạ: Khung gánh tạ Half Rack; Phụ kiện khung gánh tạ Power Rack
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Aparate și stații de antrenament pentru ridicat greutăți > Power Rack: Semi-rackuri; Accesorii pentru cadru de forță
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและแร็ค > พาวเวอร์แร็ค: ฮาล์ฟพาวเวอร์แร็ก; อุปกรณ์เสริมพาวเวอร์แร็ก
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Vektløftingsmaskiner og -stativer > Vektstativer: Half racks; Tilbehør til power racks
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 重量訓練機 > 蹲舉架: 半框式訓練架; 框架配件
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Machines & Racks > Power Racks: Half Power Racks; Power Rack Attachments
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Vægtløftningsmaskiner > Powerracks: Half racks; Tilbehør til power racks
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Atlasy treningowe i stelaże na ciężary > Stojaki na sztangi: Półklatki treningowe; Przystawki do klatek treningowych
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Maskiner och ställningar för styrketräning > Skivstångsställningar: Half racks; Tillbehör till power racks
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Vzpěrací trenažéry a posilovací stojany > Posilovací stojany/věže: Poloviční posilovací klece; Příslušenství k posilovacím klecím
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské stroje a stojany > Stojanové konštrukcie: Stojany na činky s polovičným zaťažením; Príslušenstvo k posilňovacím stojanom
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Силовые тренажеры, рамы и стойки > Силовые рамы: Силовые полурамы; Навесное оборудование для силовых рам
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő gépek és állványok > Erőállványok: Félkeretes edzőállványok; Erőkeret-kiegészítők
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Stroji in stojala za dvigovanje uteži > Naprave za vadbo moči: Polovična stojala za vadbo moči; Dodati za stojala za vadbo moči